District of Columbia statutes.
4-251.05

Reports.

No later than January 1 of each year, beginning in 2007, the Mayor shall issue a report to the Council on the subsidy program established by this chapter. At a minimum, the report shall include:

(1)

The number of applications filed for the subsidy;

(2)

The number of subsidies awarded;

(3)

The number of families receiving both the subsidy and TANF;

(4)

The number of applications denied for failure to meet eligibility criteria;

(5)

The number of applications denied for lack of appropriated funding;

(5A)

The number of subsidies transferred to a relative caregiver pursuant to § 4-251.03a;

(6)

An estimate of the number of grandparent caregivers whose income is less than 200 percent of the federally-defined poverty level but who have not applied for the subsidy;

(7)

The number of subsidies terminated by the Mayor pursuant to § 4-251.03(c) or voluntarily by the grandparent caregiver;

(8)

The number of substantiated cases of fraud and a comparison of this figure to the proportion of cases of fraud involving other benefit programs, including TANF, Food Stamps, and Medicaid;

(9)

The number of children removed from households receiving a subsidy under the program established by this chapter due to a substantiated allegation of child abuse or neglect; and

(10)

Any legislative, policy, or administrative recommendations of the Family Court of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia or of agencies designated by the Mayor to execute the provisions of this chapter that are intended to enhance the effectiveness of the program.

History

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-69, § 105, 53 DCR 54
Dec. 15, 2015, D.C. Law 21-40 , § 2(d), 62 DCR 13746

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-40 added (5A).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(d) of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Subsidy Transfer Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-177, March 7, 2015, 62 DCR 21).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 105 of Grandparent Caregivers Pilot Program Establishment Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-278, February 22, 2006, 53 DCR 1459).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(d) of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Subsidy Transfer Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-508, Dec. 8, 2014, 61 DCR 12717, 20 STAT 4429).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(d) of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Subsidy Transfer Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-33, Mar. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 4540, 21 DCSTAT 870).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Subsidy Transfer Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-200, Nov. 23, 2015, 62 DCR 15270).